Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-2827
Health care provider; proof of financial responsibility; filing by insurer.

Financial responsibility of a health care provider may be established only by filing with the director proof that the health care provider is insured pursuant to sections 44-2837 to 44-2839 or by a policy of professional liability insurance in a company authorized to do business in Nebraska. Such insurance shall be in the amount of eight hundred thousand dollars per occurrence, and an aggregate liability amount of three million dollars for all occurrences or claims made in any policy year shall be provided. The filing shall state the premium charged for the policy of insurance.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 27;

Laws 1986, LB 1005, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 146, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 998, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 19;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 59.